Illinois, session 104th, HB1570.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 5is amended by changing Section 15 and by adding Section 135 as 6follows: 7    (30 ILCS 708/15)8    Sec. 15. Definitions. As used in this Act: 9    "Allowable cost" means a cost allowable to a project if: 10        (1) the costs are reasonable and necessary for the 11    performance of the award; 12        (2) the costs are allocable to the specific project; 13        (3) the costs are treated consistently in like 14    circumstances to both federally-financed and other 15    activities of the non-federal entity;16        (4) the costs conform to any limitations of the cost 17    principles or the sponsored agreement;18        (5) the costs are accorded consistent treatment; a 19    cost may not be assigned to a State or federal award as a 20    direct cost if any other cost incurred for the same 21    purpose in like circumstances has been allocated to the 22    award as an indirect cost; 23        (6) the costs are determined to be in accordance with   HB1570- 2 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    generally accepted accounting principles; 2        (7) the costs are not included as a cost or used to 3    meet federal cost-sharing or matching requirements of any 4    other program in either the current or prior period;5        (8) the costs of one State or federal grant are not 6    used to meet the match requirements of another State or 7    federal grant; and8        (9) the costs are adequately documented.9    "Auditee" means any non-federal entity that expends State 10or federal awards that must be audited. 11    "Auditor" means an auditor who is a public accountant or a 12federal, State, or local government audit organization that 13meets the general standards specified in generally-accepted 14government auditing standards. "Auditor" does not include 15internal auditors of nonprofit organizations. 16    "Auditor General" means the Auditor General of the State 17of Illinois.18    "Award" means financial assistance that provides support 19or stimulation to accomplish a public purpose. "Awards" 20include grants and other agreements in the form of money, or 21property in lieu of money, by the State or federal government 22to an eligible recipient. "Award" does not include: technical 23assistance that provides services instead of money; other 24assistance in the form of loans, loan guarantees, interest 25subsidies, or insurance; direct payments of any kind to 26individuals; or contracts that must be entered into and   HB1570- 3 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1administered under State or federal procurement laws and 2regulations.3    "Budget" means the financial plan for the project or 4program that the awarding agency or pass-through entity 5approves during the award process or in subsequent amendments 6to the award. It may include the State or federal and 7non-federal share or only the State or federal share, as 8determined by the awarding agency or pass-through entity.9    "Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance" or "CFDA" means a 10database that helps the federal government track all programs 11it has domestically funded.12    "Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance number" or "CFDA 13number" means the number assigned to a federal program in the 14CFDA. 15    "Catalog of State Financial Assistance" means the single, 16authoritative, statewide, comprehensive source document of 17State financial assistance program information maintained by 18the Governor's Office of Management and Budget. 19    "Catalog of State Financial Assistance Number" means the 20number assigned to a State program in the Catalog of State 21Financial Assistance. The first 3 digits represent the State 22agency number and the last 4 digits represent the program. 23    "Cluster of programs" means a grouping of closely related 24programs that share common compliance requirements. The types 25of clusters of programs are research and development, student 26financial aid, and other clusters. A "cluster of programs"   HB1570- 4 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1shall be considered as one program for determining major 2programs and, with the exception of research and development, 3whether a program-specific audit may be elected.4    "Cognizant agency for audit" means the federal agency 5designated to carry out the responsibilities described in 2 6CFR 200.513(a).7    "Contract" means a legal instrument by which a non-federal 8entity purchases property or services needed to carry out the 9project or program under an award. "Contract" does not include 10a legal instrument, even if the non-federal entity considers 11it a contract, when the substance of the transaction meets the 12definition of an award or subaward. 13    "Contractor" means an entity that receives a contract. 14    "Cooperative agreement" means a legal instrument of 15financial assistance between an awarding agency or 16pass-through entity and a non-federal entity that:17        (1) is used to enter into a relationship with the 18    principal purpose of transferring anything of value from 19    the awarding agency or pass-through entity to the 20    non-federal entity to carry out a public purpose 21    authorized by law, but is not used to acquire property or 22    services for the awarding agency's or pass-through 23    entity's direct benefit or use; and 24        (2) is distinguished from a grant in that it provides 25    for substantial involvement between the awarding agency or 26    pass-through entity and the non-federal entity in carrying   HB1570- 5 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    out the activity contemplated by the award.2    "Cooperative agreement" does not include a cooperative 3research and development agreement, nor an agreement that 4provides only direct cash assistance to an individual, a 5subsidy, a loan, a loan guarantee, or insurance.6    "Corrective action" means action taken by the auditee that 7(i) corrects identified deficiencies, (ii) produces 8recommended improvements, or (iii) demonstrates that audit 9findings are either invalid or do not warrant auditee action.10    "Cost objective" means a program, function, activity, 11award, organizational subdivision, contract, or work unit for 12which cost data is desired and for which provision is made to 13accumulate and measure the cost of processes, products, jobs, 14and capital projects. A "cost objective" may be a major 15function of the non-federal entity, a particular service or 16project, an award, or an indirect cost activity.17    "Cost sharing" means the portion of project costs not paid 18by State or federal funds, unless otherwise authorized by 19statute. 20    "Development" is the systematic use of knowledge and 21understanding gained from research directed toward the 22production of useful materials, devices, systems, or methods, 23including design and development of prototypes and processes.24    "Data Universal Numbering System number" means the 9-digit 25number established and assigned by Dun and Bradstreet, Inc. to 26uniquely identify entities and, under federal law, is required   HB1570- 6 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1for non-federal entities to apply for, receive, and report on 2a federal award.3    "Direct costs" means costs that can be identified 4specifically with a particular final cost objective, such as a 5State or federal or federal pass-through award or a particular 6sponsored project, an instructional activity, or any other 7institutional activity, or that can be directly assigned to 8such activities relatively easily with a high degree of 9accuracy. 10    "Equipment" means tangible personal property (including 11information technology systems) having a useful life of more 12than one year and a per-unit acquisition cost that equals or 13exceeds the lesser of the capitalization level established by 14the non-federal entity for financial statement purposes, or 15$5,000.16    "Executive branch" means that branch of State government 17that is under the jurisdiction of the Governor.18    "Federal agency" has the meaning provided for "agency" 19under 5 U.S.C. 551(1) together with the meaning provided for 20"agency" by 5 U.S.C. 552(f).21    "Federal award" means:22        (1) the federal financial assistance that a 23    non-federal entity receives directly from a federal 24    awarding agency or indirectly from a pass-through entity; 25        (2) the cost-reimbursement contract under the Federal 26    Acquisition Regulations that a non-federal entity receives   HB1570- 7 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    directly from a federal awarding agency or indirectly from 2    a pass-through entity; or3        (3) the instrument setting forth the terms and 4    conditions when the instrument is the grant agreement, 5    cooperative agreement, other agreement for assistance 6    covered in 2 CFR 200, Subpart A, Acronyms and Definitions, 7    or the cost-reimbursement contract awarded under the 8    Federal Acquisition Regulations. 9    "Federal award" does not include other contracts that a 10federal agency uses to buy goods or services from a contractor 11or a contract to operate federal government owned, 12contractor-operated facilities. 13    "Federal awarding agency" means the federal agency that 14provides a federal award directly to a non-federal entity. 15    "Federal interest" means, for purposes of 2 CFR 200, 16Subpart D, Post Federal Award Requirements (Performance and 17Financial Monitoring and Reporting) or when used in connection 18with the acquisition or improvement of real property, 19equipment, or supplies under a federal award, the dollar 20amount that is the product of the federal share of total 21project costs and current fair market value of the property, 22improvements, or both, to the extent the costs of acquiring or 23improving the property were included as project costs.24    "Federal program" means any of the following: 25        (1) All federal awards which are assigned a single 26    number in the CFDA.   HB1570- 8 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1        (2) When no CFDA number is assigned, all federal 2    awards to non-federal entities from the same agency made 3    for the same purpose should be combined and considered one 4    program.5        (3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of this 6    definition, a cluster of programs. The types of clusters 7    of programs are:8            (A) research and development;9            (B) student financial aid; and10            (C) "other clusters", as described in the 11        definition of "cluster of programs".12    "Federal share" means the portion of the total project 13costs that are paid by federal funds.14    "Final cost objective" means a cost objective which has 15allocated to it both direct and indirect costs and, in the 16non-federal entity's accumulation system, is one of the final 17accumulation points, such as a particular award, internal 18project, or other direct activity of a non-federal entity.19    "Financial assistance" means the following:20        (1) For grants and cooperative agreements, "financial 21    assistance" means assistance that non-federal entities 22    receive or administer in the form of:23            (A) grants; 24            (B) cooperative agreements; 25            (C) non-cash contributions or donations of 26        property, including donated surplus property;   HB1570- 9 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1            (D) direct appropriations; 2            (E) food commodities; and 3            (F) other financial assistance, except assistance 4        listed in paragraph (2) of this definition. 5        (2) "Financial assistance" includes assistance that 6    non-federal entities receive or administer in the form of 7    loans, loan guarantees, interest subsidies, and insurance. 8        (3) "Financial assistance" does not include amounts 9    received as reimbursement for services rendered to 10    individuals. 11    "Fixed amount awards" means a type of grant agreement 12under which the awarding agency or pass-through entity 13provides a specific level of support without regard to actual 14costs incurred under the award. "Fixed amount awards" reduce 15some of the administrative burden and record-keeping 16requirements for both the non-federal entity and awarding 17agency or pass-through entity. Accountability is based 18primarily on performance and results. 19    "Foreign public entity" means: 20        (1) a foreign government or foreign governmental 21    entity;22        (2) a public international organization that is 23    entitled to enjoy privileges, exemptions, and immunities 24    as an international organization under the International 25    Organizations Immunities Act (22 U.S.C. 288-288f); 26        (3) an entity owned, in whole or in part, or   HB1570- 10 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    controlled by a foreign government; or 2        (4) any other entity consisting wholly or partially of 3    one or more foreign governments or foreign governmental 4    entities.5    "Foreign organization" means an entity that is: 6        (1) a public or private organization located in a 7    country other than the United States and its territories 8    that are subject to the laws of the country in which it is 9    located, irrespective of the citizenship of project staff 10    or place of performance; 11        (2) a private nongovernmental organization located in 12    a country other than the United States that solicits and 13    receives cash contributions from the general public; 14        (3) a charitable organization located in a country 15    other than the United States that is nonprofit and tax 16    exempt under the laws of its country of domicile and 17    operation, but is not a university, college, accredited 18    degree-granting institution of education, private 19    foundation, hospital, organization engaged exclusively in 20    research or scientific activities, church, synagogue, 21    mosque, or other similar entity organized primarily for 22    religious purposes; or 23        (4) an organization located in a country other than 24    the United States not recognized as a Foreign Public 25    Entity. 26    "Fringe benefits" means allowances and services provided   HB1570- 11 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1by employers to their employees as compensation in addition to 2regular salaries and wages. "Fringe benefits" include, but are 3not limited to, the costs of leave (vacation, family-related, 4sick, or military), employee insurance, pensions, and 5unemployment benefit plans. 6    "Generally Accepted Accounting Principles" has the meaning 7provided in accounting standards issued by the Government 8Accounting Standards Board and the Financial Accounting 9Standards Board. 10    "Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards" means 11generally accepted government auditing standards issued by the 12Comptroller General of the United States that are applicable 13to financial audits. 14    "Grant agreement" means a legal instrument of financial 15assistance between an awarding agency or pass-through entity 16and a non-federal entity that:17        (1) is used to enter into a relationship, the 18    principal purpose of which is to transfer anything of 19    value from the awarding agency or pass-through entity to 20    the non-federal entity to carry out a public purpose 21    authorized by law and not to acquire property or services 22    for the awarding agency or pass-through entity's direct 23    benefit or use; and24        (2) is distinguished from a cooperative agreement in 25    that it does not provide for substantial involvement 26    between the awarding agency or pass-through entity and the   HB1570- 12 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    non-federal entity in carrying out the activity 2    contemplated by the award.3    "Grant agreement" does not include an agreement that 4provides only direct cash assistance to an individual, a 5subsidy, a loan, a loan guarantee, or insurance.6    "Grant application" means a specified form that is 7completed by a non-federal entity in connection with a request 8for a specific funding opportunity or a request for financial 9support of a project or activity. 10    "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital under 11the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by 12the United States, a state, or a subdivision of a state. 13    "Illinois Debarred and Suspended List" means the list 14maintained by the Governor's Office of Management and Budget 15that contains the names of those individuals and entities that 16are ineligible, either temporarily or permanently, from 17receiving an award of grant funds from the State. 18    "Indirect cost" means those costs incurred for a common or 19joint purpose benefiting benefitting more than one cost 20objective and not readily assignable to the cost objectives 21specifically benefited benefitted without effort 22disproportionate to the results achieved.23    "Inspector General" means the Office of the Executive 24Inspector General for Executive branch agencies.25    "Loan" means a State or federal loan or loan guarantee 26received or administered by a non-federal entity. "Loan" does   HB1570- 13 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1not include a "program income" as defined in 2 CFR 200, Subpart 2A, Acronyms and Definitions. 3    "Loan guarantee" means any State or federal government 4guarantee, insurance, or other pledge with respect to the 5payment of all or a part of the principal or interest on any 6debt obligation of a non-federal borrower to a non-federal 7lender, but does not include the insurance of deposits, 8shares, or other withdrawable accounts in financial 9institutions.10    "Local government" has the meaning provided for the term 11"units of local government" under Section 1 of Article VII of 12the Illinois Constitution and includes school districts.13    "Major program" means a federal program determined by the 14auditor to be a major program in accordance with 2 CFR 200.518 15or a program identified as a major program by a federal 16awarding agency or pass-through entity in accordance with 2 17CFR 200.503(e). 18    "Non-federal entity" means a state, local government, 19Indian tribe, institution of higher education, or 20organization, whether nonprofit or for-profit, that carries 21out a State or federal award as a recipient or subrecipient.22    "Nonprofit organization" means any corporation, trust, 23association, cooperative, or other organization, not including 24institutions of higher education, that: 25        (1) is operated primarily for scientific, educational, 26    service, charitable, or similar purposes in the public   HB1570- 14 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    interest; 2        (2) is not organized primarily for profit; and 3        (3) uses net proceeds to maintain, improve, or expand 4    the operations of the organization. 5    "Obligations", when used in connection with a non-federal 6entity's utilization of funds under an award, means orders 7placed for property and services, contracts and subawards 8made, and similar transactions during a given period that 9require payment by the non-federal entity during the same or a 10future period. 11    "Office of Management and Budget" means the Office of 12Management and Budget of the Executive Office of the 13President.14    "Other clusters" has the meaning provided by the federal 15Office of Management and Budget in the compliance supplement 16or has the meaning as it is designated by a state for federal 17awards the state provides to its subrecipients that meet the 18definition of a cluster of programs. When designating an 19"other cluster", a state must identify the federal awards 20included in the cluster and advise the subrecipients of 21compliance requirements applicable to the cluster.22    "Oversight agency for audit" means the federal awarding 23agency that provides the predominant amount of funding 24directly to a non-federal entity not assigned a cognizant 25agency for audit. When there is no direct funding, the 26awarding agency that is the predominant source of pass-through   HB1570- 15 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1funding must assume the oversight responsibilities. The duties 2of the oversight agency for audit and the process for any 3reassignments are described in 2 CFR 200.513(b).4    "Pass-through entity" means a non-federal entity that 5provides a subaward to a subrecipient to carry out part of a 6program. 7    "Private award" means an award from a person or entity 8other than a State or federal entity. Private awards are not 9subject to the provisions of this Act. 10    "Property" means real property or personal property. 11    "Project cost" means total allowable costs incurred under 12an award and all required cost sharing and voluntary committed 13cost sharing, including third-party contributions. 14    "Public institutions of higher education" has the meaning 15provided in Section 1 of the Board of Higher Education Act. 16    "Recipient" means a non-federal entity that receives an 17award directly from an awarding agency to carry out an 18activity under a program. "Recipient" does not include 19subrecipients.20    "Research and Development" means all research activities, 21both basic and applied, and all development activities that 22are performed by non-federal entities. 23    "Single Audit Act" means the federal Single Audit Act 24Amendments of 1996 (31 U.S.C. 7501-7507).25    "State agency" means an Executive branch agency. For 26purposes of this Act, "State agency" does not include public   HB1570- 16 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1institutions of higher education.2    "State award" means the financial assistance that a 3non-federal entity receives from the State and that is funded 4with either State funds or federal funds; in the latter case, 5the State is acting as a pass-through entity.6    "State awarding agency" means a State agency that provides 7an award to a non-federal entity.8    "State grant-making agency" has the same meaning as "State 9awarding agency".10    "State interest" means the acquisition or improvement of 11real property, equipment, or supplies under a State award, the 12dollar amount that is the product of the State share of the 13total project costs and current fair market value of the 14property, improvements, or both, to the extent the costs of 15acquiring or improving the property were included as project 16costs.17    "State program" means any of the following:18        (1) All State awards which are assigned a single 19    number in the Catalog of State Financial Assistance.20        (2) When no Catalog of State Financial Assistance 21    number is assigned, all State awards to non-federal 22    entities from the same agency made for the same purpose 23    are considered one program.24        (3) A cluster of programs as defined in this Section.25    "State share" means the portion of the total project costs 26that are paid by State funds.  HB1570- 17 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    "Stop payment order" means a communication from a State 2grant-making agency to the Office of the Comptroller, 3following procedures set out by the Office of the Comptroller, 4causing the cessation of payments to a recipient or 5subrecipient as a result of the recipient's or subrecipient's 6failure to comply with one or more terms of the grant or 7subaward. 8    "Stop payment procedure" means the procedure created by 9the Office of the Comptroller which effects a stop payment 10order and the lifting of a stop payment order upon the request 11of the State grant-making agency. 12    "Student Financial Aid" means federal awards under those 13programs of general student assistance, such as those 14authorized by Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as 15amended (20 U.S.C. 1070-1099d), that are administered by the 16United States Department of Education and similar programs 17provided by other federal agencies. "Student Financial Aid" 18does not include federal awards under programs that provide 19fellowships or similar federal awards to students on a 20competitive basis or for specified studies or research.21    "Subaward" means a State or federal award provided by a 22pass-through entity to a subrecipient for the subrecipient to 23carry out part of a federal award received by the pass-through 24entity. "Subaward" does not include payments to a contractor 25or payments to an individual that is a beneficiary of a federal 26program. A "subaward" may be provided through any form of   HB1570- 18 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1legal agreement, including an agreement that the pass-through 2entity considers a contract. 3    "Subrecipient" means a non-federal entity that receives a 4State or federal subaward from a pass-through entity to carry 5out part of a federal program. "Subrecipient" does not include 6an individual that is a beneficiary of such program. A 7"subrecipient" may also be a recipient of other State or 8federal awards directly from a State or federal awarding 9agency. 10    "Suspension" means a post-award action by the State or 11federal agency or pass-through entity that temporarily 12withdraws the State or federal agency's or pass-through 13entity's financial assistance sponsorship under an award, 14pending corrective action by the recipient or subrecipient or 15pending a decision to terminate the award. 16    "Uniform Administrative Requirements, Costs Principles, 17and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards" means those rules 18applicable to grants contained in 2 CFR 200.19    "Voluntary committed cost sharing" means cost sharing 20specifically pledged on a voluntary basis in the proposal's 21budget or the award on the part of the non-federal entity and 22that becomes a binding requirement of the award.23(Source: P.A. 103-616, eff. 7-1-24; revised 10-24-24.) 24    (30 ILCS 708/135 new)25    Sec. 135. Contract limitations.  HB1570- 19 -LRB104 06038 HLH 16071 b1    (a) Grants shall not restrict the amount of money used to 2pay for fringe benefits.3    (b) Grants shall not restrict administrative costs to less 4than 20% of the grant award.